Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.065

Employees.

The director shall appoint adequate staff to assist him or her.

[ 2008 c 23 s 2; 1997 c 322 s 2; 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 2; 1951 c 222 s 2; 1945 c 111 s 1, part; 1941 c 252 s 5, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 8340-28, part. Formerly RCW 18.85.030.]